el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Συντήρηση, φροντίδα & διακόσμηση μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων > Υγρά οχημάτων > Καθαριστικά συστήματος καυσίμου οχημάτων: Καθαριστικά καρμπυρατέρ; Ολοκληρωμένα καθαριστικά συστήματος καυσίμου; Καθαριστικά εγχυτών καυσίμου
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物用品 > 乗り物用オイル > エンジン内部清浄剤: キャブレタークリーナー; コンプリート燃料システムクリーナー; 燃料インジェクタークリーナー
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Обслуживание, уход и декорирование > Жидкости для транспортных средств > Очистители топливной системы транспортных средств: Очистители карбюратора; Очистители всей топливной системы; Очистители топливных форсунок
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Araç Bakımı ve Dekoru > Araç Sıvıları > Araç Yakıt Sistemi Temizleyicileri: Karbüratör Temizleyicileri; Komple Yakıt Sistemi Temizleyicileri; Yakıt Enjektörü Temizleyicileri
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > การบำรุงรักษา การดูแล และการตกแต่งรถ > น้ำยาสำหรับยานยนต์ > น้ำยาทำความสะอาดระบบเชื้อเพลิงรถยนต์: น้ำยาทำความสะอาดคาร์บูเรเตอร์; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดระบบเชื้อเพลิงแบบครบวงจร; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดหัวฉีดน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Mantenimiento, cuidado y decoración de vehículos > Líquidos para vehículos > Limpiadores para sistemas de combustible de vehículos: Limpiadores de carburador; Limpiadores completos del sistema de combustible; Limpiadores de inyectores de combustible
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių priežiūra ir apdaila > Transporto priemonių skysčiai > Transporto priemonių degalų sistemos valikliai: Karbiuratorių valikliai; Visapusiški degalų sistemos valikliai; Degalų purkštukų valikliai
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Kfz-Wartung & -Pflege > Kfz-Flüssigkeiten > Tankreiniger: Vergaserreiniger; Reiniger für das komplette Kraftstoffsystem; Kraftstoffeinspritzdüsen-Reiniger
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Údržba a výzdoba motorových vozidel > Kapaliny do vozidel > Čističe palivové soustavy: Čističe karburátorů; Čističe celého palivového systému; Čističe vstřikovačů paliva
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Údržba, starostlivosť a dekorácia vozidiel > Kvapaliny pre vozidlá > Čističe palivového systému vozidiel: Čističe karburátorov; Čističe celého palivového systému; Čističe palivových vstrekovačov
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Întreținerea, îngrijirea și decorarea vehiculelor > Fluide vehicule > Produse de curățare sistem combustibil vehicul: Produse de curățare carburator; Produse curățare completă sistem combustibil; Produse de curățare injectoare combustibil
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Manutenção, cuidado e decoração para veículos motorizados > Fluidos de veículo > Limpadores do sistema de combustível para veículos: Limpadores de carburador; Limpadores completos do sistema de combustível; Limpadores de injetores de combustível
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Decoração, cuidado e manutenção de veículos > Fluidos para veículos > Produtos de limpeza do sistema de combustível para veículos: Produtos de limpeza para carburador; Produtos de limpeza para o sistema de combustível completo; Produtos de limpeza para injetores de combustível
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Cura, manutenzione e decorazione dei veicoli > Liquidi per veicoli > Detergenti per il sistema di alimentazione dei veicoli: Detergenti per carburatori; Detergenti completi per il sistema di alimentazione; Detergenti per iniettori di carburante
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Поддръжка, грижа и декорация на превозни средства > Течности за превозни средства > Препарати за почистване на горивната система на превозни средства: Препарати за почистване на карбуратори; Препарати за пълно почистване на горивна система; Препарати за почистване на горивни инжектори
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Vzdrževanje, nega in okrasitev vozil > Tekočine za vozila > Čistila za sistem goriva zavozilo: Čistila za uplinjače; Čistila za celoten sistem goriva; Čistila za vbrizgalne šobe
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøyvedlikehold, -pleie og -dekor > Kjøretøyvæsker > Bensinsystemrens til kjøretøy: Forgasserrensere; Komplett rens av drivstoffsystemet; Drivstoffinjektorrensere
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Pleje og udsmykning af motorkøretøjer > Væsker til biler > Rensemidler til brændstofsystemer i motorkøretøjer: Karburatorrensere; Rensemidler til brændstofsystemer; Brændstofindsprøjtningsrensere
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 交通工具护理 > 汽车护理液 > 汽车燃油系统清洁剂: 化油器清洁剂; 完整燃油系统清洁剂; 喷油嘴清洁剂
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Motorfordonsvård > Fordonsvätskor > Rengöringsvätska till bränslesystem: Rengöringsmedel för förgasare; Rengöringsvätska till komplett bränslesystem; Rengöringsmedel för bränsleinsprutare
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Maintenance, Care & Decor > Vehicle Fluids > Vehicle Fuel System Cleaners: Carburetor Cleaners; Complete Fuel System Cleaners; Fuel Injector Cleaners
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Konserwacja, pielęgnacja i ozdabianie pojazdów > Płyny eksploatacyjne > Dodatki czyszczące do paliwa: Środki do czyszczenia gaźników; Kompletne środki do czyszczenia układu paliwowego; Środki do czyszczenia wtryskiwaczy paliwa
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Onderhoud en decoratie voor voertuigen > Vloeistoffen voor voertuigen > Brandstofsysteemreinigers voor voertuigen: Carburateurreinigers; Complete brandstofsysteemreinigers; Brandstofinjectorreinigers
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Bảo dưỡng, chăm sóc và trang trí xe > Dầu xe > Dung dịch vệ sinh hệ thống nhiên liệu trong xe: Chất tẩy rửa bộ chế hòa khí; Chất tẩy rửa hệ thống nhiên liệu hoàn chỉnh; Chất tẩy rửa kim phun nhiên liệu
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 정비/관리/장식 > 차량 용액 > 차량 연료 첨가제: 카뷰레이터 클리너; 컴플릿 연료 시스템 클리너; 연료 분사기 클리너
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛保養與裝飾 > 車用劑液 > 車輛燃油系統清潔劑: 化油器清潔劑; 燃油系統清潔劑; 噴油嘴清潔劑
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműkarbantartás, -gondozás és -dekoráció > Járműfolyadékok > Járműüzemanyag-rendszer tisztítók: Karburátortisztítók; Teljes üzemanyag-rendszer tisztítók; Üzemanyag-befecskendező tisztítók
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Ajoneuvon huolto, hoito ja sisustus > Ajoneuvon nesteet > Ajoneuvon polttoainejärjestelmän puhdistajat: Kaasuttimen puhdistusaineet; Täydelliset polttoainejärjestelmän puhdistusaineet; Polttoainesuuttimen puhdistusaineet
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Održavanje, njega i uređenje vozila > Tekućine za vozila > Sredstva za čišćenje sustava goriva vozila: Sredstva za čišćenje rasplinjača; Sredstva za potpuno čišćenje sustava goriva vozila; Sredstva za čišćenje mlaznica za gorivo
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Entretien et décoration de véhicules > Liquides pour véhicules > Nettoyants pour circuits d'alimentation de véhicules: Nettoyants pour carburateurs; Nettoyants complets pour circuits d'alimentation; Nettoyants pour injecteurs de carburant